Hawaii statutes.
[§163D-16] Use of public lands; acquisition
of state lands. (a) Notwithstanding chapter 171 to the contrary, the
governor may transfer lands located within a project area to the corporation
for its use.

(b) If state lands under the control and
management of other public agencies are required by the corporation for its
purposes, the agency having the control and management of those required lands,
upon request by the corporation and with the approval of the governor, may
lease the lands to the corporation upon such terms and conditions as may be
agreed to by the parties.

(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) to the
contrary, no public lands shall be leased to the corporation if the lease would
impair any covenant between the State or any county, or any department or board
thereof, and the holders of bonds issued by the State or the county,
department, or board. [L 1994, c 264, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next